Hawaii statutes.
§448-9.6 Community service license. (a)
The board of dental examiners may issue, without examination, a community service
license to practice dentistry in the employment of the department of health, a
federally qualified health center, Native Hawaiian health systems center, or
post-secondary dental auxiliary training program accredited by the American
Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation. Community service
licensees under this section shall abide by the requirements and conditions placed
upon those fully licensed under this chapter.

Eligible candidates shall:

(1) Provide copies of documentation and credentials
that include but are not limited to:

(A) A diploma or certificate of graduation
from a dental college accredited by the American Dental Association Commission
on Dental Accreditation, recognized and approved by the board; and

(B) Either of the following:

(i) A certificate or other evidence
satisfactory to the board of having passed part II of the National Board Dental
Examination within five years of the date of request; or

(ii) Evidence of active practice of clinical
dentistry of not less than one thousand hours per year for the three years
immediately prior to the date of request;

(2) Provide a copy of an active, unrestricted dental
practice license from another state;

(3) Disclose to the board of dental examiners all
previous and pending legal or regulatory action relating to claims of
malpractice, or personal or professional misconduct; and

(4) Pay applicable registration fees, which shall be
one half of the prevailing biennial registration fee for dentistry.

No person who after July 2, 2004, has failed to pass
the license examination administered under this chapter shall have the benefit
of a community service dental license.

(b) Community service licensees shall actively
participate in a formal and ongoing program of clinical quality assurance.

(c) A license may be renewed biennially,
pending review and reauthorization of the board of dental examiners.

(d) A community service license authorizes the
licensee to practice dentistry only within the employment of an eligible
organization and shall be in force until the earliest of the following occurs:

(1) The date the person leaves the employment
authorized under the community service license;

(2) The date on which the results of the license
examination taken by the person under this chapter are posted by the board;

(3) The date the community service license expires;
or

(4) The date on which the board revokes the community
service license; provided that the board may revoke the community service
license at any time for cause.

(e) Commissioned officers of the United States
Army, the United States Navy, the United States Air Force, the United States
Public Health Service, or the United States Veterans Administration practicing
in the department of health, a federally qualified health center, or Native
Hawaiian health systems center shall qualify for a community service license to
practice dentistry, which may be issued for the term of the officer's federal
duty assignment. Officers shall provide to the board of dental examiners:

(1) A copy of an active, unrestricted dental practice
license from another state; and

(2) A copy of documentation reflecting official duty
assignment to a qualifying community service dental license site. [L 2004, c
166, §3; am L 2006, c 31, §§1, 2; am L 2009, c 36, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next